New York, session 2025-2026, S10110.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 137 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. For the purposes of any disciplinary proceeding of an incarcerated 4 individual in a correctional facility, there shall be an adverse infer- 5 ence against the testimony of an officer or other employee of the 6 department, where such officer or other employee violated department 7 rules or regulations by turning off a facility camera or body-worn 8 camera or otherwise prevented such camera or cameras from recording the 9 incident which is the subject of such disciplinary proceeding. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13255-01-5